test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_suaittu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - kiäčču: # ok SUAITTU
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäčˊču
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäj̣u
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäj̣u
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäčun
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäj̣ust
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Com:  kiäj̣oin
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊj̣uttáá
    kiäčču+N+Ess:  kiäčˊčun
    kiäčču+N+Par:  kiäčˊčud
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäj̣uh
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäj̣ui, kiäˊj̣ui]
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäj̣uid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäj̣oid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäj̣uin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊj̣uiguin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊj̣uittáá

  Noun - suáittu: # ok SUAITTU
    suáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  suáiˊttu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  suáitun
    suáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  suáitust
    suáittu+N+Sg+Com:  suáiˊttoin
    suáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊituttáá
    suáittu+N+Ess:  suáiˊttun
    suáittu+N+Par:  suáiˊttud
    suáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  suáituh
    suáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [suáitui, suáˊitui]
    suáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  suáituid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  suáiˊttoid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  suáituin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊituiguin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊituittáá

  Noun - suánju: # ok; nj is actually one consonant; might cause some troubles with WG. 
    suánju+N+Sg+Nom:  suáṇju
    suánju+N+Sg+Gen:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Acc:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Ill:  suáṇjun
    suánju+N+Sg+Loc:  suánjust
    suánju+N+Sg+Com:  suánjoin
    suánju+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊnjuttáá
    suánju+N+Ess:  suánnjun
    suánju+N+Par:  suánnjud
    suánju+N+Pl+Nom:  suánjuh
    suánju+N+Pl+Gen: [suánjui, suáˊnjui]
    suánju+N+Pl+Acc:  suánjuid
    suánju+N+Pl+Ill:  suánjoid
    suánju+N+Pl+Loc:  suánjuin
    suánju+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊnjuiguin
    suánju+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊnjuittáá

  Noun - juávkku: # ok SUAITTU
    juávkku+N+Sg+Nom:  juávˊkku
    juávkku+N+Sg+Gen:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Acc:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Ill:  juávkun
    juávkku+N+Sg+Loc:  juávhust
    juávkku+N+Sg+Com:  juávˊhoin
    juávkku+N+Sg+Abe:  juáˊvhuttáá
    juávkku+N+Ess:  juávˊkkun
    juávkku+N+Par:  juávˊkkud
    juávkku+N+Pl+Nom:  juávhuh
    juávkku+N+Pl+Gen: [juávhui, juáˊvhui]
    juávkku+N+Pl+Acc:  juávhuid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Ill:  juávˊhoid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Loc:  juávhuin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Com:  juáˊvhuiguin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Abe:  juáˊvhuittáá

  Noun - puákku: # ok SUAITTU
    puákku+N+Sg+Nom:  puákˊku
    puákku+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Acc:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Ill:  puákun
    puákku+N+Sg+Loc:  puáhust
    puákku+N+Sg+Com:  puáhˊhoin
    puákku+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊhuttáá
    puákku+N+Ess:  puákˊkun
    puákku+N+Par:  puákˊkud
    puákku+N+Pl+Nom:  puáhuh
    puákku+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáhui, puáˊhui]
    puákku+N+Pl+Acc:  puáhuid
    puákku+N+Pl+Ill:  puáhˊhoid
    puákku+N+Pl+Loc:  puáhuin
    puákku+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊhuiguin
    puákku+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊhuittáá

  Noun - ruávvu: # ok SUAITTU
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruávˊvu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruáṿu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruáṿu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáṿun
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruáṿust
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávˊvoin
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruáˊṿuttáá
    ruávvu+N+Ess:  ruávˊvun
    ruávvu+N+Par:  ruávˊvud
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruáṿuh
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Gen:  [ruáṿui, ruáˊṿui]
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruáṿuid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávˊvoid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruáṿuin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Com:  ruáˊṿuiguin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruáˊṿuittáá


  Noun - vuálppu: # ok SUAITTU
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuálˊppu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuálpun
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuálpust
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Com:  vuálˊppoin
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊlputtáá
    vuálppu+N+Ess:  vuálˊppun
    vuálppu+N+Par:  vuálˊppud
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuálpuh
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [vuálpui, vuáˊlpui]
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuálpuid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuálˊppoid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuálpuin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊlpuiguin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊlpuittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhˊháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par:  luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhˊháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá

  Noun - vuárkká:
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Nom:  vuárˊkká
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Gen:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Acc:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárkán
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárhást
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Com:  vuárˊháin
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊrháttáá
    vuárkká+N+Ess:  vuárˊkkán
    vuárkká+N+Par:  vuárˊkkád
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Nom:  vuárháh
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárhái, vuáˊrhái]
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Acc:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Ill:  vuárˊháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Loc:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊrháiguin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊrháittáá

  Noun - kuávská:
    kuávská+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávˊská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávskást
    kuávská+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊskáin
    kuávská+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvskáttáá
    kuávská+N+Ess:  kuávˊskán
    kuávská+N+Par:  kuávˊskád
    kuávská+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávskáh
    kuávská+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávskái, kuáˊvskái]
    kuávská+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvskáiguin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvskáittáá

  Noun - kuáhčá:
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhˊčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess:  kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par:  kuáhˊčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávčái, kuáˊvčái]
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvčáittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälˊkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälˊháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊlháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälˊkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälˊkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: [kiälhái, kiäˊlhái]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälˊháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊlháiguin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊlháittáá

  Noun - miärkká:
    miärkká+N+Sg+Nom:  miärˊkká
    miärkká+N+Sg+Gen:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Acc:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Ill:  miärkán
    miärkká+N+Sg+Loc:  miärhást
    miärkká+N+Sg+Com:  miärˊháin
    miärkká+N+Sg+Abe:  miäˊrháttáá
    miärkká+N+Ess:  miärˊkkán
    miärkká+N+Par:  miärˊkkád
    miärkká+N+Pl+Nom:  miärháh
    miärkká+N+Pl+Gen: [miärhái, miäˊrhái]
    miärkká+N+Pl+Acc:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Ill:  miärˊháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Loc:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Com:  miäˊrháiguin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Abe:  miäˊrháittáá

  Noun - riävská:
    riävská+N+Sg+Nom:  riävˊská
    riävská+N+Sg+Gen:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Acc:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Ill:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Sg+Loc:  riävskást
    riävská+N+Sg+Com:  riävˊskáin
    riävská+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊvskáttáá
    riävská+N+Ess:  riävˊskán
    riávská+N+Par:  riävˊskád
    riävská+N+Pl+Nom:  riävskáh
    riävská+N+Pl+Gen: [riävskái, riäˊvskái]
    riävská+N+Pl+Acc:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Ill:  riävˊskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Loc:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊvskáiguin
    riävská+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊvskáittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätˊká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđˊháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkán
    riätká+N+Par:  riätˊkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: [riäđhái, riäˊđhái]
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđˊháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊđháiguin
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊđháittáá

  Noun - vuástá:
    vuástá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuásˊtá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuástást
    vuástá+N+Sg+Com:  vuásˊtáin
    vuástá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊstáttáá
    vuástá+N+Ess:  vuásˊtán
    vuástá+N+Par:  vuásˊtád
    vuástá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuástáh
    vuástá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuástái, vuáˊstái]
    vuástá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuásˊtáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊstáiguin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊstáittáá
